Washington statutes.
RCW 2.40.020

Witness fee and mileage in civil cases demandable in advance.

Witnesses in civil cases shall be entitled to receive, upon demand, their fees for one day's attendance, together with mileage going to the place where they are required to attend, if such demand is made to the officer or person serving the subpoena at the time of service.

[Code 1881 s 2100; 1869 p 374 s 22; RRS s 507.]